Nebraska, session 109, LB1178.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1178 LB1178
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 30-2619, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2619 (a) The person alleged to be incapacitated or any person
interested in his or her welfare may petition for a finding of incapacity
and appointment of a guardian or a standby guardian. The petition shall
be verified and shall contain specific allegations with regard to each of
the areas as provided under section 30-2619.01 in which the petitioner
claims that the person alleged to be incapacitated lacks sufficient
understanding to make or communicate responsible decisions concerning his
or her own person. An interested person may file a motion to make more
definite and certain requesting a specific description of the functional
limitations and physical and mental condition of the person alleged to be
incapacitated with the specific reasons prompting the request for
guardianship.
(b) Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall set a date for
hearing on the issues of incapacity and unless the person alleged to be
incapacitated has retained counsel of his or her own choice or has
otherwise indicated a desire for an attorney of his or her own choice,
the court may appoint an attorney to represent him or her in the
proceeding. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem as provided in
sections 30-4201 to 30-4210 to advocate for the best interests of the
person alleged to be incapacitated.
(c) The person alleged to be incapacitated may be examined by a
physician appointed by the court. The physician shall submit his or her
report in writing to the court and may be interviewed by a visitor, if so
appointed pursuant to sections 30-2619.01 and 30-2624, sent by the court.
(d) The person alleged to be incapacitated is entitled to be present
at the hearing virtually or in person and to see and hear all evidence
bearing upon his or her condition. He or she is entitled to be present by
counsel, to compel the attendance of witnesses, to present evidence, to
cross-examine witnesses, including the court-appointed physician and the
-2-

LB1178 LB1178
2026 2026
visitor appointed by the court pursuant to sections 30-2619.01 and
30-2624, and to appeal any final orders or judgments. The issue may be
determined at a closed hearing only if the person alleged to be
incapacitated or his or her counsel so requests.
(e) At any hearing conducted under this section, the court may
designate one or more standby guardians of the person whose appointment
will become effective immediately upon the death, unwillingness or
inability to act, resignation, or removal by the court of the initially
appointed guardian and upon compliance with any rules promulgated by the
Supreme Court. The standby guardian shall have the same powers and duties
as the initially appointed guardian. The standby guardian shall receive a
copy of the order establishing or modifying the initial guardianship and
the order designating the standby guardian. Upon assuming office, the
standby guardian shall so notify the court in writing. Upon notification
and upon compliance with any rules promulgated by the Supreme Court, the
court shall issue new letters of guardianship that specify that the
standby guardianship appointment is permanent. A standby guardian shall
complete the training required by section 30-2601.01 at the time or times
required by rules promulgated by the Supreme Court or as otherwise
provided by order of the county court.
(f) The Public Guardian shall not be appointed as a standby
guardian.
Sec. 2. Section 30-2623, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2623 (a) On petition of the ward or any person interested in the
ward's his welfare, the court may remove a guardian and appoint a
successor if in the best interests of the ward. On petition of the
guardian, the court may accept the guardian's his resignation and make
any other order which may be appropriate.
(b) An order adjudicating incapacity may specify a minimum period,
not exceeding one year, during which no petition for an adjudication that
-3-

LB1178 LB1178
2026 2026
the ward is no longer incapacitated may be filed without special leave.
Subject to this restriction, the ward or any person interested in the
ward's his welfare may petition for an order that the ward he is no
longer incapacitated, and for removal or resignation of the guardian. A
request for this order may be made by informal letter to the court or
judge and any person who knowingly interferes with transmission of this
kind of request to the court or judge may be adjudged guilty of contempt
of court.
(c) Before removing a guardian, accepting the resignation of a
guardian, or ordering that a ward's incapacity has terminated, the court,
following the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the ward as
apply to a petition for appointment of a guardian, may send a visitor to
the residence of the present guardian and to the place where the ward
resides or is detained, to observe conditions and report in writing to
the court.
(d) In any court hearing under this section, the ward shall have the
right to attend the hearing virtually or in person.
Sec. 3. Section 30-2625, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2625 (a) In a proceeding for the appointment of a guardian for a
person alleged to be incapacitated or the removal of a guardian of a ward
other than the appointment of a temporary guardian or temporary
suspension of a guardian, notice of hearing shall be given to each of the
following:
(1) The ward or the person alleged to be incapacitated and his or
her spouse, parents, and adult children;
(2) Any person who is serving as guardian or conservator of the ward
or who has care and custody of a person alleged to be incapacitated; and
(3) If no other person is notified under subdivision (1) of this
subsection, at least one of the closest adult relatives of the ward or
person alleged to be incapacitated, if any can be found.
-4-

LB1178 LB1178
2026 2026
(b) Notice which is appropriate to the circumstances of the ward or
person alleged to be incapacitated shall be served personally at least
fourteen days prior to the hearing on the ward or person alleged to be
incapacitated and his or her spouse and parents if they can be found
within the state. The court may require the petitioner to serve notice in
alternative formats or with appropriate auxiliary aids and services if
necessary to ensure equally effective communication with the ward or
person alleged to be incapacitated, including, but not limited to, the
use of braille, sign language, large print, reading aloud, or other
reasonable accommodation for the known disabilities of the individual
based on the allegations specified in the petition. Waiver of notice by
the person alleged to be incapacitated shall not be effective unless he
or she attends the hearing and the court determines that the waiver is
appropriate.
(c) In addition to notifying him or her of the filing of the
petition and the time and place of the hearing on the petition, the
notice required to be served upon the person alleged to be incapacitated
shall list the following rights of the person:
(1) The right to request the appointment of an attorney;
(2) The right to present evidence in his or her own behalf;
(3) The right to request that the power of the guardian, if
appointed, be limited by the court;
(4) The right to be notified regarding how to contact the temporary
guardian if a temporary guardian is appointed;
(5) The right to compel attendance of witnesses;
(6) The right to cross-examine witnesses, including the court-
appointed physician;
(7) The right to appeal any final order; and
(8) The right to request a hearing closed to the public; and .
(9) The right to attend each court hearing virtually or in person,
including a hearing held on the original petition, a hearing held
-5-

LB1178 LB1178
2026 2026
regarding a change or termination of a guardian, and a show cause
hearing.
(d) If a temporary guardian has been appointed, the notice required
in subsection (c) of this section shall include a notice of such
appointment and of the right to request an expedited hearing pursuant to
section 30-2626.
Sec. 4. Section 30-2627, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2627 (a) Any competent person or the Public Guardian may be
appointed guardian of a person alleged to be incapacitated, except that
it shall be unlawful for any agency providing residential care in an
institution or community-based program, or any owner, part owner,
manager, administrator, employee, or spouse of an owner, part owner,
manager, administrator, or employee of any nursing home, room and board
home, assisted-living facility, or institution engaged in the care,
treatment, or housing of any person physically or mentally handicapped,
infirm, or aged to be appointed guardian of any such person residing,
being under care, receiving treatment, or being housed in any such home,
facility, or institution within the State of Nebraska. Nothing in this
subsection shall prevent the spouse, adult child, parent, or other
relative of the person alleged to be incapacitated from being appointed
guardian or prevent the guardian officer for one of the Nebraska veterans
homes as provided in section 80-327 from being appointed guardian or
conservator for the person alleged to be incapacitated. It shall be
unlawful for any county attorney or deputy county attorney appointed as
guardian for a person alleged to be incapacitated to circumvent his or
her duties or the rights of the ward pursuant to the Nebraska Mental
Health Commitment Act by consenting to inpatient or outpatient
psychiatric treatment over the objection of the ward.
(b) Persons who are not disqualified under subsection (a) of this
section and who exhibit the ability to exercise the powers to be assigned
-6-

LB1178 LB1178
2026 2026
by the court have priority for appointment as guardian in the following
order:
(1) A person nominated most recently by one of the following
methods:
(i) A person nominated by the incapacitated person in a power of
attorney or a durable power of attorney;
(ii) A person acting under a power of attorney or durable power of
attorney; or
(iii) A person nominated by an attorney in fact who is given power
to nominate in a power of attorney or a durable power of attorney
executed by the incapacitated person;
(2) The spouse of the incapacitated person;
(3) An adult child of the incapacitated person;
(4) A parent of the incapacitated person, including a person
nominated by will or other writing signed by a deceased parent;
(5) Any relative of the incapacitated person with whom he or she has
resided for more than six months prior to the filing of the petition;
(6) A person nominated by the person who is caring for him or her or
paying benefits to him or her;
(7) The Public Guardian.
(c) When appointing a guardian, the court shall take into
consideration the expressed wishes of the allegedly incapacitated person.
The court, acting in the best interest of the incapacitated person, may
pass over a person having priority and appoint a person having lower
priority or no priority. With respect to persons having equal priority,
the court shall select the person it deems best qualified to serve.
(d) In its order of appointment, unless waived by the court, the
court shall require any person appointed as guardian to successfully
complete within three months of such appointment a training program
approved by the Public Guardian. If the person appointed as guardian does
not complete the training program, the court shall issue an order to show
-7-

LB1178 LB1178
2026 2026
cause why such person should not be removed as guardian.
(e) The court may require a guardian to furnish a bond in an amount
and conditioned in accordance with the provisions of sections 30-2640 and
30-2641. The Public Guardian shall not be required to post bond.
(f) A guardian shall monitor the ward or protected person and his or
her care on a continuing basis no less than once per month. The guardian
shall maintain a written record of each visit with a ward or protected
person and shall have periodic contact with all public or private
individuals and agencies that provide care or related services to the
ward or protected person.
Sec. 5. Section 30-2636, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-2636 (a) Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a
conservator or other protective order because of minority, the court
shall set a date for hearing on the matters alleged in the petition. If,
at any time in the proceeding, the court determines that the interests of
the minor are or may be inadequately represented, the court may appoint
an attorney to represent the minor, giving consideration to the choice of
the minor if he or she is fourteen years of age or older. A lawyer
appointed by the court to represent a minor as provided in sections
30-4201 to 30-4210 has the powers and duties of a guardian ad litem.
(b) Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a conservator or
other protective order for reasons other than minority, the court shall
set a date for hearing. Unless the person to be protected has counsel of
his or her own choice, the court may appoint an attorney to represent him
or her in the proceeding. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem as
provided in sections 30-4201 to 30-4210 to advocate for the best
interests of the person to be protected. If the alleged disability is
mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness or disability,
chronic use of drugs, or chronic intoxication, the court may direct that
the person to be protected be examined by a physician designated by the
-8-

LB1178 LB1178
2026 2026
court, preferably a physician who is not connected with any institution
in which the person is a patient or is detained. The court may send a
visitor to interview the person to be protected. The visitor may be a
guardian ad litem or an officer or employee of the court.
(c) The minor or person to be protected under subsections (a) and
(b) of this section shall have the right to attend each court hearing
virtually or in person.
(d) (c) After hearing, upon finding that clear and convincing
evidence exists for the appointment of a conservator or other protective
order, the court shall make an appointment or other appropriate
protective order.
Sec. 6. In any judicial proceeding involving the appointment of a
guardian or a conservator, the administration of a guardianship or
conservatorship, or an accounting for a guardianship or a
conservatorship, the court, as justice and equity may require, may award
costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, to any party,
to be paid by another party or from the trust that is the subject of the
controversy.
Sec. 7. Original sections 30-2619, 30-2623, 30-2625, 30-2627, and
30-2636, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-9-